Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-1104. Acts 1995, No. 922, § 3.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 974, § 10.

12-12-1018. Receipt and analysis of DNA samples — Availability of information.

The State Crime Laboratory shall:

Receive, store, and perform analyses on DNA samples or contract for DNA typing analysis with a qualified DNA laboratory that meets guidelines as established by the State Crime Laboratory;

Classify and file the DNA record of identification characteristic profiles of DNA samples submitted under this subchapter; and

The results of the DNA profile of individuals in the State DNA Data Base shall be made available:

To a criminal justice agency or to an approved crime laboratory that serves a criminal justice agency; or

To a criminal justice official upon written or electronic request from the criminal justice official and in furtherance of an official investigation of a criminal offense.

The State Crime Laboratory shall promulgate rules governing the methods of obtaining information from the State DNA Data Base and CODIS and procedures for verification of the identity and authority of the requester.

The State Crime Laboratory may create a separate population database composed of DNA samples obtained under this subchapter after all personal identification is removed.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 974, § 10.

12-12-1019. Removal and destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample.

Any person whose DNA record is included in the State DNA Data Base and whose DNA sample is stored in the State DNA Data Bank as authorized by this subchapter may apply to the State Crime Laboratory for removal and destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample if the arrest that led to the inclusion of the DNA record and DNA sample:

Resulted in a charge that has been resolved by:

A written request for removal and destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample;

A court order for removal and destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample; and

Either of the following:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 974, § 10; 2015, No. 543, § 2.

Subchapter 11

— State Convicted Offender DNA Data Base Act

12-12-1101. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Convicted Offender DNA Data Base Act”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 1; 2003, No. 1470, § 1.

12-12-1102. Purpose.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

DNA data banks are an important tool in:

Criminal investigations;

The exclusion of individuals who are the subjects of criminal investigations or prosecutions; and

Deterring and detecting recidivist acts;

Several states have enacted laws requiring persons convicted of certain crimes, especially sexual offenses, to provide genetic samples for DNA profiling;

Moreover, it is the policy of this state to assist federal, state, and local criminal justice and law enforcement agencies in the identification and detection of individuals in criminal investigations; and

It is therefore in the best interest of the State of Arkansas to establish a DNA data base and a DNA data bank containing DNA samples submitted by individuals convicted of sex offenses and violent offenses.

Unlike the situation in a prior case, the state presented proof that defendant's un-degraded DNA was on a ski mask, found with a pair of gloves, 129 feet from the back door of the house where the rape occurred, and the victim testified that the attacker wore a ski mask and gloves, and that the mask and gloves shown to the victim by police looked like the ones the victim saw on the victim's attacker, and in conjunction with defendant's inconsistent defense theories, the evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction. Haynes v. State, 354 Ark. 514, 127 S.W.3d 456 (2003), cert. denied, 541 U.S. 1047, 124 S. Ct. 2168, 158 L. Ed. 2d 740 (2004).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 2.

12-12-1103. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Adjudication of guilt” and words of similar import mean a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, a negotiated plea, a finding of guilt by a judge, or a finding of guilt by a jury;

“Administration of criminal justice” means:

Performing functions of investigation, apprehension, detention, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders;

Performing criminal identification activities; and

Collecting, maintaining, and disseminating justice information;

“CODIS” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation's national DNA identification index system that allows the storage and exchange of DNA records submitted by state and local forensic laboratories.

CODIS is derived from Combined DNA Index System;

“Criminal justice agency” means a government agency, or any subunit thereof, which is authorized by law to perform the administration of criminal justice and which allocates more than one-half (½) its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice;

“DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid.

DNA is located in the cells and provides an individual's personal genetic blueprint.

DNA encodes genetic information that is the basis of human heredity and forensic identification;

“DNA record” means deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) identification information stored in the State DNA Data Base or CODIS for the purpose of generating investigative leads or supporting statistical interpretation of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test results.

The DNA record is the result obtained from the DNA typing tests.

The DNA record is composed of the characteristics of a DNA sample which are of value in establishing the identity of individuals.

The results of all DNA identification tests on an individual's DNA sample are also collectively referred to as the DNA profile of an individual;

“DNA sample” means a blood or tissue sample provided by any person with respect to offenses covered by this subchapter or submitted to the State Crime Laboratory for analysis or storage or both;

“FBI” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation;

“Qualifying offense” means any felony offense as defined in the Arkansas Criminal Code or a sexual offense classified as a misdemeanor as defined by the Arkansas Criminal Code or a repeat offense as defined in this section; and

“Repeat offense” means a second or subsequent adjudication of guilt in a separate criminal action for the commission of any misdemeanor or felony offense involving violence as set forth in Arkansas law, the law of another state, federal law, or military law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 2003, No. 1470.

Subdivision (10) of this section was also amended by Acts 2003, No. 1087, which added two subdivisions to read as follows:

“(xviii)Computer child pornography - §5-27-603; and

“(xix)Computer exploitation of a child in the first degree - §5-27-605 (a);”

Subdivision (10) of this section was also amended by Acts 2003, No. 1390, § 5, to read as follows:

“(10)‘Sex offense’ means:

“(A)(i)Rape - §5-14-103;

“(ii)Sexual indecency with a child - §5-14-110;

“(iii)Sexual assault in the first degree - §5-14-124;

“(iv)Sexual assault in the second degree - §5-14-125;

“(v)Sexual assault in the third degree - §5-14-126;

“(vi)Sexual assault in the fourth degree - §5-14-127;

“(vii)Incest - §5-26-202;

“(viii)Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium - §5-27-303;

“(ix)Transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct - §5-27-305;

“(x)Employing or consenting to use of child in sexual performance - §5-27-402;

“(xi)Producing, directing, or promoting sexual performance - §5-27-403;

“(xii)Promoting prostitution in the first degree - §5-70-104; and

“(xiii)Stalking - §5-71-229;

“(B)An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses enumerated in subdivision (10)(A) of this section; or

“(C)A violation of any former law of this state which is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses enumerated in subdivision (10)(A) of this section; and”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (2)(B); redesignated former (2)(A) as present (2) and (2)(A); added present (2)(B) and (2)(C); and made related changes.

Meaning of “Arkansas Criminal Code”. See note to §5-1-101.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Criminal Law, Computer Crimes, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 361.

Based on the clear, unambiguous language of §12-12-1109(a)(2)(A) and subdivision (1) of this section, it was clear that the trial court did not illegally sentence defendant by requiring him to submit to a DNA sample after he received a suspended sentence because whatever conflict §5-4-101 might have provided, if any, was resolved by the fact that its definitions were used only for Title 5, Chapter 4. Davis v. State, 94 Ark. App. 240, 228 S.W.3d 529 (2006).

In a rape case, although defendant argued that a blood sample had been illegally taken from him when he was incarcerated in 1997 for non-payment of child support, which was not a qualifying offense named in the State Convicted Offenders DNA Database Act, §12-12-1101 et seq., and it was based on that sample that the state obtained a “hit,” because defendant had submitted to another blood sample in 2000 when incarcerated for burglary, pursuant to §12-12-1109(a), the appellate court found that the state met its burden of proof in establishing that the DNA evidence was admissible, pursuant to the inevitable discovery doctrine. Haynes v. State, 354 Ark. 514, 127 S.W.3d 456 (2003), cert. denied, 541 U.S. 1047, 124 S. Ct. 2168, 158 L. Ed. 2d 740 (2004).

Cited: Polston v. State, 360 Ark. 317, 201 S.W.3d 406 (2005).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 3; 2003, No. 1087, § 12; 2003, No. 1390, § 5; 2003, No. 1470, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 43.

12-12-1104. Powers and duties of State Crime Laboratory.

In addition to any other powers and duties conferred by this subchapter, the State Crime Laboratory shall:

Be responsible for the policy management and administration of the state DNA identification record system to support law enforcement agencies and other criminal justice agencies;

Promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this subchapter; and

Provide for liaison with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and other criminal justice agencies in regard to the state's participation in CODIS or in any DNA data base designated by the laboratory.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (2).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 868.

12-12-1105. State DNA Data Base.

There is established the State DNA Data Base.

The State Crime Laboratory shall administer the data base and provide DNA records to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for storage and maintenance in CODIS.

The data base shall have the capability provided by computer software and procedures administered by the laboratory to store and maintain DNA records related to:

Crime scene evidence and forensic casework;

Convicted offenders and juveniles adjudicated delinquent who are required to provide a DNA sample under this subchapter;

Offenders who were required to provide a DNA sample under former § 12-12-1101 et seq.;

Anonymous DNA records used for forensic validation, quality control, or establishment of a population statistics database;

Unidentified persons or body parts;

Missing persons and biological relatives of missing persons;

Persons arrested for a felony offense who are required to provide a DNA sample under § 12-12-1006; and

Juveniles adjudicated delinquent who are required to provide a DNA sample under § 9-27-357.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §12-12-1101 et seq., referred to in subdivision (b)(3) of this section, was derived from Acts 1995, No. 922, §§ 1-3, which was subsequently repealed by Acts 1997, No. 737, § 23.

Acts 2009, No. 974, § 1, provided: “This act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Juli's Law’.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Missing persons and biological relatives” for “Relatives” in (b)(6); added (b)(7); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2015 amendment added (b)(8).

Supreme Court of Arkansas adopted the totality of the circumstances test and determined that the DNA collection statute did not constitute an unreasonable search and seizure under the Fourth Amendment; a convicted felon has a diminished expectation of privacy in the penal context, a blood test does not constitute an unduly extensive imposition on an individual's privacy and bodily integrity, and the state's interest in solving crimes is substantial. Polston v. State, 360 Ark. 317, 201 S.W.3d 406 (2005).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 5; 2003, No. 1470, § 3; 2009, No. 974, § 11; 2015, No. 1084, § 2.

12-12-1106. State DNA Data Bank.

There is established the State DNA Data Bank.

It shall serve as the repository of DNA samples collected under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 6.

12-12-1107. State Crime Laboratory recommendation of additional offenses.

The State Crime Laboratory may recommend to the General Assembly that it enact legislation for the inclusion of additional offenses for which DNA samples shall be taken and otherwise subjected to the provisions of this subchapter.

In determining whether to recommend additional offenses, the laboratory shall consider those offenses for which DNA testing will have a substantial impact on the detection and identification of sex offenders and violent offenders.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 7.

12-12-1108. Procedural compatibility with the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The DNA identification system as established by the State Crime Laboratory shall be compatible with the procedures specified by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, including use of comparable test procedures, laboratory equipment, supplies, and computer software.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 8.

12-12-1109. DNA sample required upon adjudication of guilt.

A person who is adjudicated guilty for a qualifying offense on or after August 1, 1997, shall have a DNA sample drawn as follows:

A person who is adjudicated guilty for a qualifying offense and sentenced to a term of confinement for that qualifying offense shall have a DNA sample drawn upon intake to a prison, jail, or any other detention facility or institution.

If the person is already confined at the time of sentencing, the person shall have a DNA sample drawn immediately after the sentencing;

A person who is adjudicated guilty for a qualifying offense shall have a DNA sample drawn as a condition of any sentence in which disposition will not involve an intake into a prison, jail, or any other detention facility or institution.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the agency supervising the convicted offender shall determine the time and collection of the DNA sample;

A person who is acquitted on the grounds of mental disease or defect of the commission of a qualifying offense and committed to an institution or other facility shall have a DNA sample drawn upon intake to that institution or other facility; and

Under no circumstance shall a person who is adjudicated guilty for a qualifying offense be released in any manner after this disposition unless a DNA sample has been drawn.

A person who has been adjudicated guilty for a qualifying offense before August 1, 1997, and who is still serving a term of confinement in connection therewith on August 1, 1997, shall not be released in any manner prior to the expiration of his or her maximum term of confinement unless and until a DNA sample has been drawn.

All DNA samples taken pursuant to this section shall be taken in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Crime Laboratory in consultation with the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Department of Human Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts.

When the state accepts a person from another state under any interstate compact or under any other reciprocal agreement with any county, state, or federal agency or any other provision of law, whether or not the person is confined or released, the acceptance is conditional on the person's providing a DNA sample if the person was convicted of an offense in any other jurisdiction which would be considered a qualifying offense as defined in § 12-12-1103(9) if committed in this state or if the person was convicted of an equivalent offense in any other jurisdiction.

The person shall provide the DNA sample in accordance with the rules of the custodial institution or supervising agency.

The requirements of this subchapter are mandatory and apply regardless of whether or not a court advises a person that a DNA sample must be provided to the State DNA Data Base and State DNA Data Bank as a condition of probation or parole.

A person who has been sentenced to death or life without the possibility of parole or to any life or indeterminate term of incarceration is not exempt from the requirements of this subchapter.

Any person subject to this subchapter who has not provided a DNA sample for any reason, including the person's release prior to July 16, 2003, an oversight, or because of the person's transfer from another jurisdiction, shall give a DNA sample for inclusion in the data base after being notified by the supervising agency.

In the event that a person's DNA sample is not adequate for any reason, the person shall provide another DNA sample for analysis.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2003, No. 1265 did not contain a section designated as Section 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (c), substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement and Emergency Management, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 501.

Supreme Court of Arkansas adopted the totality of the circumstances test and determined that the DNA collection statute did not constitute an unreasonable search and seizure under the Fourth Amendment; a convicted felon has a diminished expectation of privacy in the penal context, a blood test does not constitute an unduly extensive imposition on an individual's privacy and bodily integrity, and the state's interest in solving crimes is substantial. Polston v. State, 360 Ark. 317, 201 S.W.3d 406 (2005).

In a rape case, although defendant argued that a blood sample had been illegally taken from him when he was incarcerated in 1997 for non-payment of child support, which was not a qualifying offense named in the State Convicted Offenders DNA Database Act, §12-12-1101 et seq., and it was based on that sample that the state obtained a “hit,” because defendant had submitted to another blood sample in 2000 when incarcerated for burglary, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the appellate court found that the state met its burden of proof in establishing that the DNA evidence was admissible, pursuant to the inevitable discovery doctrine. Haynes v. State, 354 Ark. 514, 127 S.W.3d 456 (2003), cert. denied, 541 U.S. 1047, 124 S. Ct. 2168, 158 L. Ed. 2d 740 (2004).

Based on the clear, unambiguous language of subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section and §12-12-1103(1), it was clear that the trial court did not illegally sentence defendant by requiring him to submit to a DNA sample after he received a suspended sentence because whatever conflict §5-4-101 might have provided, if any, was resolved by the fact that its definitions were used only for Title 5, Chapter 4. Davis v. State, 94 Ark. App. 240, 228 S.W.3d 529 (2006).

DNA samples from persons who are not committed or sentenced to a term of confinement shall be drawn at another facility to be specified by the sentencing court.

Only those individuals qualified to draw DNA samples in a medically approved manner shall draw a DNA sample to be submitted for analysis.

In addition to the DNA sample, a right thumbprint shall be taken from the person from whom the DNA sample is drawn for the exclusive purpose of verifying the identity of the person.

The agency or institution having custody or control or the agency providing supervision of persons convicted or adjudicated delinquent for qualifying offenses, as appropriate, is authorized to contract with third parties to provide for the collection of the DNA samples.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (e)(1).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Cited: Polston v. State, 360 Ark. 317, 201 S.W.3d 406 (2005).

The DNA sample and the right thumbprint provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be delivered to the State Crime Laboratory in accordance with guidelines established by the laboratory.

(1)Persons authorized by this section to draw blood shall not be criminally liable for drawing a DNA sample and transmitting the DNA sample pursuant to this subchapter if they perform these activities in good faith.

(1)Authorized law enforcement and corrections personnel may employ reasonable force in cases where an individual refuses to submit to DNA testing authorized under this subchapter.

(1)Any person who refuses to provide a DNA sample required by this subchapter will receive no further sentence reduction for meritorious good time until such time as a sample is provided, and the Division of Correction shall notify the Parole Board regarding the refusal.

(1)The State Crime Laboratory shall adopt rules governing the procedures to be used in the submission, identification, analysis, storage, and disposition of DNA samples and typing results of DNA samples submitted under this subchapter.

The typing results of DNA samples shall be securely stored in the data base, and records of testing shall be retained on file with the State Crime Laboratory consistent with the procedures established by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(1)Except as otherwise provided in § 12-12-1112, the tests to be performed on each DNA sample shall be used only for law enforcement identification purposes or to assist in the recovery or identification of human remains from disasters or for other humanitarian identification purposes, including identification of missing persons.

(1)The State Crime Laboratory is authorized to contract with third parties for purposes of this subchapter.

The results of the DNA profile of individuals in the State DNA Data Base shall be made available:

Methods of Obtaining Information.The State Crime Laboratory shall adopt rules governing the methods of obtaining information from the State DNA Data Base and CODIS and procedures for verification of the identity and authority of the requester.

(1)Any person whose DNA record has been included in the State DNA Data Base and whose DNA sample is stored in the State DNA Data Bank may apply to any circuit court for removal and destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample on the grounds that the adjudication of guilt that resulted in the inclusion of the person's DNA record in the data base or the inclusion of the person's DNA sample in the data bank has been reversed and the case dismissed.

(1)Upon receipt of an order of removal and destruction and unless otherwise provided, the State Crime Laboratory shall purge the DNA record and other identifiable information from the data base and the DNA sample stored in the data bank covered by the order.

All DNA profiles and samples submitted to the State Crime Laboratory pursuant to this subchapter shall be treated as confidential except as otherwise provided in this subchapter.

All DNA records and DNA samples submitted to the laboratory pursuant to this subchapter are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

(1)Any person who by virtue of employment or official position or any person contracting to carry out any functions under this subchapter, including any officers, employees, and agents of this contractor who has possession of or access to individually identifiable DNA information contained in the State DNA Data Base or State DNA Data Bank shall not disclose the information in any manner to any person or agency not entitled to receive it, knowing that the person is not entitled to receive it.

Any person who knowingly violates this section is guilty of a Class D felony.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 974, § 1, provided: “This act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Juli's Law’.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “Class D felony” for “Class A misdemeanor” in (b).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 9; 2001, No. 218, § 1; 2003, No. 1265, § 6[5]; 2003, No. 1470, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 869; 2019, No. 910, § 726.

12-12-1110. Procedures of withdrawal, collection, and transmission of DNA samples.

(1)(A)Each DNA sample required to be taken pursuant to §12-12-1109 from persons who are incarcerated shall be taken by the agency supervising the convicted offender.

Persons authorized to draw blood shall not be civilly liable for such activities when the persons acted in a reasonable manner and according to generally accepted medical and other professional practices.

No such employee shall be criminally or civilly liable for the use of reasonable force.

Any person who is subject to this subchapter who knowingly refuses to provide the DNA sample after receiving notification of the requirement to provide a DNA sample shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 10; 2003, No. 1470, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 727.

12-12-1111. Procedures for conduct, disposition, and use of DNA analysis.

These procedures shall also include quality assurance guidelines to ensure that DNA identification records meet standards for laboratories which submit DNA records to the State DNA Data Base.

The results of the analysis conducted pursuant to this subchapter from a person adjudicated delinquent may be used for any law enforcement agency identification purpose, including adult prosecution.

The detention, arrest, or conviction of a person based on a data-base match or data-base information is not invalidated if the DNA sample was obtained or placed in the data base by mistake.

Any third party contracting to carry out the functions of this subchapter shall be subject to the same restrictions and requirements of this subchapter, insofar as applicable, as the State Crime Laboratory as well as any additional restrictions imposed by the State Crime Laboratory.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 11; 2003, No. 1470, § 4.

12-12-1112. Receipt and analysis of DNA samples — Availability of information.

(a)

Receipt of DNA Samples by State Crime Laboratory.

The State Crime Laboratory shall receive DNA samples, store, perform analysis or contract for DNA typing analysis with a qualified DNA laboratory that meets the guidelines as established by the State Crime Laboratory, classify and file the DNA record of identification characteristic profiles of DNA samples submitted under this subchapter, and make such information available from the State DNA Data Base as provided in this section.

The State Crime Laboratory may contract out the storage of DNA typing analysis and may contract out DNA typing analysis to a qualified DNA laboratory that meets guidelines as established by the State Crime Laboratory.

To criminal justice agencies or to approved crime laboratories which serve these criminal justice agencies; or

Upon written or electronic request and in furtherance of an official investigation of a criminal offense.

(d)

Population Database.

The State Crime Laboratory may create a separate population database composed of DNA samples obtained under this subchapter after all personal identification is removed.

The State Crime Laboratory may share or disseminate the population database with other criminal justice agencies or crime laboratories that serve to assist the State Crime Laboratory with statistical databases.

The population database may be made available to and searched by other agencies participating in the CODIS system.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 12.

12-12-1113. Removal and destruction of the DNA record and DNA sample.

A copy of the application for removal and destruction shall be served on the prosecutor for the county in which the adjudication of guilt was obtained not less than twenty (20) days prior to the date of the hearing on the application.

A certified copy of the order reversing and dismissing the adjudication of guilt shall be attached to an order removing and destroying the DNA record and DNA sample insofar as its inclusion rests upon that adjudication of guilt.

If the entry in the data base reflects more than one (1) adjudication of guilt, that entry shall not be removed and destroyed unless and until the person has obtained an order of removal and destruction for each adjudication of guilt on the grounds contained in subsection (a) of this section.

If one (1) of the bases for inclusion in the data base was other than adjudication of guilt, that entry shall not be subject to removal and destruction.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 13.

12-12-1114. Confidentiality.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 14; 2003, No. 1470, § 5.

12-12-1115. Prohibition against disclosure.

No person shall obtain individually identifiable DNA information from the data base or the data bank without authorization to do so.

In order to maintain the computer system security of the State Crime Laboratory, data base, and data bank program, the computer software, and data-base structures used by the laboratory to implement this subchapter are confidential.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 15; 2003, No. 1470, § 5; 2009, No. 974, § 12.

12-12-1116. Prohibition against disclosure for pecuniary gain.

Upon conviction, a person is guilty of a Class D felony if the person:

Possesses or accesses individually identifiable DNA information contained in the State DNA Data Base or State DNA Data Bank;

Carries out functions of this subchapter as an employee, official, or contractor, including an officer, employee, or agent of a contractor; and

For pecuniary gain of the person or another person, knowingly discloses individually identifiable DNA information contained in the data base or data bank in any manner to a person or agency not authorized to receive the individually identifiable DNA information contained in the data base or data bank.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 974, § 1, provided: “This act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Juli's Law’.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 16; 2009, No. 974, § 13.

12-12-1117. Injunctions.

The State Crime Laboratory or any other aggrieved individual or agency may institute an action in a court of competent jurisdiction against any person, agency, or organization to enjoin any criminal or noncriminal justice agency, organization, or individual from violating the provisions of this subchapter or to compel the agency, organization, or person to comply with the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 17.

12-12-1118. Mandatory cost.

Unless finding that undue hardship would result, the sentencing court shall assess at the time of sentencing a mandatory fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) on any person who is required to provide a DNA sample under this subchapter.

The fine provided in subsection (a) of this section and collected in circuit court or district court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Fund Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration on a form provided by that office for deposit into the DNA Detection Fund as established by § 12-12-1119.

Cross References. DNA Detection Fund, §19-6-447.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 18; 2003, No. 1765, § 5.

12-12-1119. DNA Detection Fund.

There is hereby established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “DNA Detection Fund”.

This fund shall consist of special revenues collected pursuant to §12-12-1118, there to be used by the State Crime Laboratory for the administration of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 19.

12-12-1120. Authority of law enforcement officers.

Nothing in this subchapter shall limit or abrogate any existing authority of law enforcement officers to take, maintain, store, and utilize DNA samples for law enforcement purposes.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 737, § 20.

Subchapter 12

— Victim Notification System

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 12: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an alarming lack of transparency in the corrections system regarding information about inmates who will soon be coming up for parole and released into society; that it is vital to public safety that the public know exactly what potential threats exist from inmates in the Department of Correction who will soon be introduced back into society; and that this act is immediately necessary because the sooner inmate, parolee, and probationer information is made available to the public, the sooner the public is able to evaluate who is and who is not a threat to society. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

12-12-1201. Authorization.

The Arkansas Crime Information Center is authorized to develop and operate a computerized victim notification system which shall provide:

A mechanism for victims of criminal offenses or the victim's next of kin to access information about proceedings in the criminal justice and corrections systems by use of a twenty-four-hour toll-free in-watts telephone service; and

Automatic notification by computerized telephone service to the victims of criminal offenses or the victim's next of kin of:

An inmate's, parolee's, or probationer's status, including the location of the inmate, parolee, or probationer; and

A person's release or modification of a conditional release from the custody of the Arkansas State Hospital, a local or regional hospital, a local or regional mental health facility, or a local or regional jail to which the person has been committed by a court when the person committed a criminal act against the victim but was adjudicated in the criminal case to have a mental disease or defect under § 5-2-301 et seq.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in (2), substituted “parolee's, or probationer's” for “custody” and added “parolee, or probationer”.

The 2017 amendment redesignated part of former (2) as (2)(A); substituted “of” for “about” at the end of the introductory language of (2); and added (2)(B).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1250, § 1; 2015, No. 1265, § 3; 2017, No. 429, § 1.

12-12-1202. Information provided.

A victim notification may be accomplished by means of the computerized victim notification system established under § 12-12-1201 if the notification is required under:

Section 12-29-114, pertaining to escape;

Section 16-21-106, pertaining to assistance to victims and witnesses of crimes;

Section 16-93-204, pertaining to executive clemency;

Section 16-93-615, pertaining to transfer hearings;

Section 16-93-702, pertaining to parole;

Section 16-97-102, pertaining to sentencing; or

Section 5-2-315, pertaining to discharge or conditional release from a commitment by a court to the Arkansas State Hospital.

The computerized victim notification system established under § 12-12-1201 shall also include:

Information about an inmate's custody status in regard to furloughs, work release, and community correction programs, if applicable;

Information about a person who was committed to the Arkansas State Hospital due to his or her having a mental disease or defect under § 5-2-301 et seq. in regard to the status of the person being discharged or conditionally released under § 5-2-315, including the location and name of the local or regional hospital, local or regional mental health facility, or local or regional jail in which the person is committed if the person is not being held at the Arkansas State Hospital; and

The location of information publicly available under § 12-27-145.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 570, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. The intent of this act is to implement comprehensive measures designed to reduce recidivism, hold offenders accountable, and contain correction costs.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted former (a)(6); redesignated former (a)(7) as present (a)(6); and substituted “correction” for “punishment” in (b).

The 2011 amendment substituted “16-93-615” for “16-93-206” in (a)(4).

The 2015 amendment substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in the introductory language of (a); inserted designation (b)(1); and added (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment substituted “if the notification is required under” for “if under” in the introductory language of (a); added (a)(7); added “if applicable” in (b)(1); inserted (b)(2); and redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(3).

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2003 (2d Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 13. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-12-1301. Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 15; 2001, No. 1650, § 5; 2001, No. 1740, § 1.

12-12-1302. Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 15; 2001, No. 1740, § 2.